Utah statutes.
73-3c-303.   Inflow of unappropriated water -- Application to appropriate.
If domestic wastewater inflow to a POTW consists of any unappropriated
infiltration water, a person may apply to the state engineer to appropriate
the unappropriated infiltration water to a beneficial use in accordance with
Section 73-3-8.
